__TOC__Darwin and Women*Darwin and WomenAn Wikipedia:Wiki Ed/University of Oklahoma/Science, Nature and Society (Fall 2015)|education project is active. I reverted some extreme WP:SYNTH from this article on the basis that it was a copyvio from . The material was then copied to Darwin and Women and edited. It was speedy deleted as a copyvio, but has been recreated with text that is probably less of a copyvio (I haven't studied it), but it is still highly misguided. Editors from this page might want to have a look. Johnuniq (talk) 00:45, 8 December 2015 (UTC)Difference between racesI would like to add the point that Darwin recognized differences between human races while emphasizing their similarities based on the following statements from The Descent of Man, and Selection in Relation to Sex:"Although the existing races of man differ in many respects, as in colour, hair, shape of skull, proportions of the body, ;c., yet if their whole organisation be taken into consideration they are found to resemble each other closely in a multitude of points. Many of these points are of so unimportant or of so singular a nature, that it is extremely improbable that they should have been independently acquired by aboriginally distinct species or races. The same remark holds good with equal or greater force with respect to the numerous points of mental similarity between the most distinct races of man. The American aborigines, Negroes and Europeans differ as much from each other in mind as any three races that can be named; yet I was incessantly struck, whilst living with the Fuegians on board the ''Beagle,'' with the many little traits of character, shewing how similar their minds were to ours; and so it was with a full-blooded negro with whom I happened once to be intimate." [comment as of 19:07, 11 December 2015‎ by R3venans];—Preceding unsigned comment added by Stan Giesbrecht (talk • Special:Contributions/Stan Giesbrecht|contribs) 16:33, 24 December 2015‎;;;:This is concisely covered by noting that CD was against "ranking the so-called races of man as distinct species", with more detail in footnote VI. Do you propose a published reliable secondary source supporting more detail, and some brief wording you'd like to see added? . dave souza, talk 17:09, 24 December 2015 (UTC)::First, this comment was originally posted by R3venans, who was falsely accused of being a racist and holocaust denier and blocked from editing.  After he was blocked, this post on the talk page was vindictively deleted, which is against Wikipedia policy as blocks are not allowed to be punitive.  I restored his comment as a matter of principle. R3venans has been unblocked, but I have no knowledge whether he is still interested in pursuing any changes to this page.::I have recently made a number of edits on the Descent of Man article.  There were a lot of distortions and lies there about Darwin’s views on race that I felt had to be addressed.  I understand that this is challenging the sacred orthodoxy a bit, and maybe I’ll be unceremoniously punted off Wikipedia like R3venans was, but hopefully not.::I haven’t had much time to review the Charles Darwin page, but footnote VI that you refer to is also dishonest.  It says “Darwin did not share the … view that other races are inferior”, which is clearly and explicitly false.  Darwin referred to the so-called savage races as being lower on the organic scale in The Descent of Man.  Furthermore, the line you refer to about Darwin being “against ranking the so-called races of man as distinct species” might not be false but it is deliberately misleading.  Darwin firmly believed in the distinctness of human races.  The question for him was whether they should be considered species or subspecies.  While Darwin ultimately held that human races were subspecies, it was somewhat of a semantic issue for him.  He wrote that the definition of species is “so arbitrary”(Descent, 1874, page 177) that “it is almost a matter of indifference” whether human races “are ranked as species or sub-species”.(1874, page 180)::It is my understanding that I am not allowed to edit the Charles Darwin page, as it is protected.  But any self-respecting encyclopedia article on Charles Darwin would include this information, as well as the point that R3venans was making: that Darwin recognized significant differences between the races.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 07:24, 25 December 2015 (UTC)::*Welcome to the club--I'm always thrilled when a brand-new editor walks in the door armed with some decent knowledge of the project and its guidelines, even if the interpretation is somewhat lacking. Happy editing, Drmies (talk) 03:27, 27 December 2015 (UTC)::::Thank you for the welcome.  I appreciate it.  Charles Darwin was one of the 5 greatest scientists that ever lived, so hopefully we can work together to ensure accuracy in the reporting of what he actually said.  There are some major inaccuracies in this article, so it needs some work as well.::::You said I misinterpreted the project and/or the guidelines, but didn’t providing any specifics, so I’m not sure how to interpret that.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 07:31, 27 December 2015 (UTC)::::Drmies, you made a vague allegation that I misinterpreted something, but did not say whether it was in relation to Wikipedia policy and guidelines or to Charles Darwin’s writings or to something else altogether.  I certainly could have made mistakes and errors and they should be corrected.  There are also legitimate issues to discuss over style of presentation.  But, I have spent many hours reading The Descent of Man and I am quite confident that my interpretations are substantially correct.::::I would very much appreciate if you would specify the specific point(s) that I have misinterpreted along with evidence to back up the charge, or in the alternative, to withdraw the accusation.  Baseless allegations are hardly appropriate on Wikipedia.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 21:04, 27 December 2015 (UTC):::::Oh, this isn't about Darwin--it's comments about blocks not supposed to be punitive, for instance, which not everyone knows by the time they made a half a dozen edits; the note about "vindictive" removals, which is a comment about motive which wouldn't be easily accessible to someone who just walked in; in general, one wonders how you got to delve into the history of this article talk page in the first place. Drmies (talk) 22:19, 27 December 2015 (UTC)::::::Thank you for the clarification.  I am glad that you are not disputing my reporting of what Charles Darwin wrote.  You questioned why I “delve[d] into the history of this article talk page in the first place”.  This should be obvious from my post on the Descent of Man talk page where I highlighted my complete and utter disgust for the way numerous editors have been lying about and distorting Darwin’s views on race.  Cleaning up this mess will not be an easy task as there are such inaccuracies in many articles, but it has to be done if Wikipedia wants to keep its excellent reputation.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 23:46, 27 December 2015 (UTC):::::::The situation ''is'' obvious, and there will be no cleaning of the claimed mess in this featured article unless based on scholarly analysis by reliable secondary sources. What Darwin wrote 150 years ago should not be interpreted from a 21st century viewpoint. Johnuniq (talk) 05:09, 28 December 2015 (UTC)Thank you, Johnuniq, for your post.  I would like a clarification on your position, if you would please, only because neither you nor Drmies disputed my reporting of Darwin's writings.  Focusing on one fact in particular, it is beyond doubt that Darwin ''wrote'' that human races are “distinct subspecies”.  This is relevant to the Charles Darwin article, because determining the taxonomic rank of human races was 1 of the 3 questions which Darwin said that he would confine himself to(Descent, 1874, page 2) in The Descent of Man, his second most important work.  Furthermore, Darwin’s own writings are cited many times by this article, because, of course, Wikipedia allows primary sources when their reliability is firmly established.So to clarify, you are saying that you would be willing to oppose any addition that doesn’t have a ''secondary source meeting your approval'', even if the fact in question is (1) established beyond dispute, (2) relevant to the article, and (3) properly sourced according to Wikipedia policy.  Do I understand your position correctly?  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 19:12, 28 December 2015 (UTC):Yes Stan Giesbrecht, as noted above it's Wikipedia policy to base articles on third party secondary sources, and refer to such sources for any interpretation of the primary source. You're not only basing arguments on a primary source, but seem to be taking words out of context. For some reason you're citing the 1874 second edition, but from  you've quoted "so arbitrary" but left out "is the term of species, that such early races would perhaps have been ranked by some naturalists as distinct species, if their differences, although extremely slight, had been more constant than they are at present, and had not graduated into each other." So here Darwin is arguing against these early races being ranked as species. Similarly, from  you quote  that “it is almost a matter of indifference” whether human races “are ranked as species or sub-species” out of the context::So, CD is stating that "sub-species" is more appropriate from his evolutionary viewpoint,  in relation to the dispute between the monogenists and the polygenists. You seem to be misrepresenting his rather complex argument, and so we'll have to give careful consideration to the other edits you've made which may incorporate similar misrepresentation. To settle this, a good published secondary source is needed. . . dave souza, talk 20:02, 28 December 2015 (UTC)::1. It's true that I have been using the 2nd edition from 1874 (and sometimes the 2nd edition from 1882).  I first started reading the 2nd edition, and now it’s what I know best.  Most of the content is substantially the same as the 1st edition, so it’s usually not a big deal.  Referencing is somewhat easier with the 2nd edition because there is only one volume, but I recognize that me using the 2nd edition makes it harder for people using the 1st, so I apologize for that.::2. Dave souza, you say that “Darwin is arguing against these early races being ranked as species” in the quoted passage from page 177. This simply isn’t true.  He is actually saying that if early races were more isolated than they are now, they might potentially have been classified as different species back then.  But that’s not the point.  The point is, Darwin ''is'' saying that the term “species” is arbitrary, exactly as I reported.::3. You claim that “CD is stating that "sub-species" is more appropriate from his evolutionary viewpoint, in relation to the dispute between the monogenists and the polygenists.”  This is patently false.  There is nothing in this paragraph or the rest Chapter 7 that could justify your claim that sub-species refers to the monogenism / polygenism debate for 4 reasons.  (1) This paragraph is a summary of some preceding paragraphs after which Darwin goes on to other topics.  The first 4 sentences explain that Darwin thinks the term “species” is not well defined but that subspecies is more appropriate to describe human races (''again, as I reported'').  The last sentence concludes his views of the monogenism / polygenism debate which he discussed on the preceding pages.  (2) The last sentence comes after the first 4, but does not refer to them at all.  It is a complete thought all on its own.  (3)  As Darwin explained on the preceding pages, the monogenism / polygenism debate was whether humans originated from a single source or had multiple origins.  I won't go into the details, but it is an entirely different discussion than whether or not human races are subspecies.  (4) If there is any doubt about what Darwin means by sub-species in Chapter 7, it is succinctly answered in the concluding chapter, where he wrote, “Through the means just specified, aided perhaps by others as yet undiscovered, man has been raised to his present state. '''But since he attained to the rank of manhood, he has diverged into distinct;/u; races, or as they may be more fitly called, subspecies;/u;'''.” (emphasis added, 1874, page 608) That’s very clear evidence that Darwin thought subspecies applied to present day humans and not the monogenism / polygenism debate as you claimed.::4. The truth is, ''you'' are the one taking things out of context, and then accusing me of what you are guilty of.  I have seen this tactic used many times on Answers In Genesis.  It can be very effective to distract an audience from a black and white situation.  I hope my edits do get the ''careful'' consideration that you call for.  I do make mistakes at times, but Darwin’s writings are not nearly as complicated as you pretend they are, and I am extremely confident that my summarizing of his work is substantially correct.::5. With all that said, this is mostly a diversion from my original comment to Johnuniq's post.  I don’t think Darwin's comments about the definition of species being arbitrary should go in the Charles Darwin article.  dave souza was replying to what I had posted in the Descent of Man article and not what I posted in the talk page here.  Obviously the article on Descent of Man should substantially summarize the contents of the book, unlike the Charles Darwin article which should only focus on the important issues.::6. In my original comment to Johnuniq, I was focusing on the fact that Darwin ''wrote and believed'' that human races were distinct subspecies, which definitely needs go on the Charles Darwin page. Why the distinction?  Because this was important to Darwin.  In the introduction to the Descent of Man, Darwin lists 3 points that he confines himself in the book.  The 3rd point listed was to determine the taxonomic rank of human races.(1874, page 2 + 166)  The Descent was the second most important of all of Darwin’s works.  It is something that he had considered doing much earlier, but was scared of the backlash.  The fact that the issue of ranking human races was one of his 3 mains points of such a hugely important book shows that this issue was very important to him.  Furthermore, he gave a clear and succinct answer to the question he posed.  So, in conclusion, any self-respecting encyclopedia article on Charles Darwin will report that he wrote that humans diverged into distinct subspecies, using a neutral point of view.  That is what I am asked for.  The world didn't end when he brought us the theory evolution, and the world won't end if we accurately report what he wrote.  Thank you for your consideration.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 03:56, 29 December 2015 (UTC):::This is not a forum where editors swap opinions on the topic, nor is it a place to express personal opinions arising from examination of original documents. Here is the secondary sources link again—such sources are the only thing that will receive attention here. Johnuniq (talk) 04:22, 29 December 2015 (UTC)::::1. It is not a “personal opinion” that Darwin wrote that humans have diverged into distinct subspecies.  It is an ''empirical fact''.::::2. You wrote, “This is not a forum where editors swap opinions on the topic”.  I wasn’t swapping opinions, I was pointing out inaccuracies in Dave souza’s post.::::3. Here is the third-party secondary source that you have been asking for: , from the Guardian, states: “This article was amended on 29 June 2015. An earlier version said Darwin did not think human races might be separate sub-species. '''In fact he did refer to human races as sub-species'''.” (emphasis added).  In the article, Adam Rutherford argues that race doesn’t exist.  He claimed that Darwin didn’t think human races were separate subspecies to bolster his argument, but he and the newspaper acknowledged that this wasn’t true when presented with the evidence that his claim was false.::::4. You are misapplying the Wikipedia policy on sources.  From the link you provided: “Unless restricted by another policy, '''primary sources that have been reputably published may be used in Wikipedia'''; but only with care, because it is easy to misuse them.” (emphasis added)  The Descent of Man is definitely reputably published, so there is no prohibition to relying on it for straight forward information, such as the quote I bolded and underlined in para 3 of my previous post, and this information is further verified by the Guardian.::::5. The fact that Darwin ''wrote'' that humans have diverged into subspecies is true, verified, reliable, properly sourced, relevant, important to Charles Darwin, simple, and straight forward.  It is only political correctness gone overboard that is preventing it from being reported in the Charles Darwin article.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 02:27, 30 December 2015 (UTC)We don't get to interpret what he wrote.  It simply doesn't work that way as has been pointed out to you.  Move on.  Dbrodbeck (talk) 02:39, 30 December 2015 (UTC):Thanks to Stan Giesbrecht for producing a secondary source, which may be useful for supporting the point that CD was not a racist. This merits discussion in a new section. Regarding Stan Giesbrecht's other comments, it's not acceptable to make accusations of lies or "political correctness gone overboard" from editors, "assume good faith" is mandatory and more civility is needed for continuing discussion. . dave souza, talk 18:33, 30 December 2015 (UTC)::What’s unacceptable is to claim that I made a point out of context when I hadn’t.  What’s unacceptable is to claim that Darwin was only referring to subspecies in the monogenism / polygenism debate, when he wrote in the conclusion that “[Man] has diverged into distinct … subspecies”.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 20:25, 30 December 2015 (UTC):1. Dbrodbeck, you’re absolutely right. It has been pointed out to me many times … in church: “Trust in the Lord with all thine heart; and '''lean not unto thine own understanding'''” (emphasis added, Proverbs 3:5, KJV).  In truth though, I am not ''interpreting'' anything.  It is a straight forward reading of both primary and secondary sources.:2. But as you say, it is time to move on.  I deeply respect the consensus building process on Wikipedia, and you’re correct that the consensus here is that the world is not quite ready for this much Charles Darwin.  Which is kind of sad, but that’ll change in due course.  People are hungry for knowledge.  So, I’ll be back, and so will others.:3. With that said, I would like to '''request 2 deletions''', both of which unsourced and inconsistent with Darwin’s writings. I propose deleting: (1) “not racial inferiority;/u;” in the sentence “To Darwin, the difference showed cultural advances, not racial inferiority.” in the section “Voyage of the Beagle”; and (2) “Darwin did not share the then common view that other races are inferior;/u;” in footnote VI.  In fact, Darwin ''did'' refer to races as being higher and lower in the organic scale in The Descent of Man.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 20:25, 30 December 2015 (UTC)::1. Dave Souza, I waited over 23 hours before making these 2 deletions. You quickly reverted it, claiming that the first line (“not racial inferiority”) was sourced by the citation for the ''following'' sentence.  I think that’s improperly cited.    The sentence is completely inconsistent with everything in the Descent of Man.  I'm not doing original research, I'm using common sense.  Because it is likely to be challenge, it needs to be cited directly.  How is the reader supposed to know that the citation doesn’t refer only to the one sentence it’s attached to?  But I didn't come here to edit war.::2. I posted my intention to make the deletion.  You didn't say you were opposed, despite having a whole day to do so, but it didn't take you long to make the reversion.  That’s poor form.  That’s what Wikipedia has a talk page for.::3. The second line, “Darwin did not share the then common view that other races are inferior” in the footnote isn’t sourced.  Please advise me: '''Are you going to revert me again''' if I delete that one again?  Are you going to tell me on the talk page here or will I only find out after I make the deletion?  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 22:23, 31 December 2015 (UTC):::As noted in the edit summary, it is sourced to Browne.  There is no consensus for this change.  Dbrodbeck (talk) 22:31, 31 December 2015 (UTC)::::That's not correct. The 1st line I deleted might be sourced to Browne, but the 2nd ("Darwin did not share the then common view that other races are inferior") certainly isn't. Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 22:49, 31 December 2015 (UTC):::::You need WP:CONSENSUS to make the change.  I just don't see it.  Dbrodbeck (talk) 23:25, 31 December 2015 (UTC)::::::Note VI in the article--''Darwin did not share the then common view that other races are inferior, and said of his taxidermy tutor John Edmonstone, a freed black slave, "I used often to sit with him, for he was a very pleasant and intelligent man",''--seems to be a mistaken synthesis: the fact that Darwin found Edmonstone "pleasant and intelligent" does not say Darwin did not consider the man inferior. (Edmonstone is unnamed in the , and not called a tutor, but simply referred to as ''a negro [who] lived in Edinburgh, who had travelled with Waterton and gained his livelihood by stuffing birds.'');::::::In an 1862 , Darwin wrote, "It is very true what you say about the higher races of men, when high enough, replacing ; clearing off the lower races. In 500 years how the Anglo-saxon race will have spread ; exterminated whole nations; ; in consequence how much the Human race, viewed as a unit, will have risen in rank." Without a source to support the assertion in the note, this is sufficient to keep it out. Before somebody jumps on me for OR/SYN with a primary source, read on, please.::::::Marek Kohn's  ( tertiary source) of Adrian Desmond ; James R. Moore's ''Darwin's Sacred Cause'' (a secondary source) says, "Darwin thus emphasised human unity and dwelt upon superficial differences, '''while acquiescing in the contemporary assumption that some races were superior to others'''." [Emphasis added.]::::::Steven Rose, in EMBO Reports, [wrote], "Darwin was, after all, a man of his time, class and society. True, he was committed to a monogenic, rather than the prevailing polygenic, view of human origins, but he still divided humanity into distinct races according to differences in skin, eye or hair colour. '''He was also convinced that evolution was progressive, and that the white races—especially the Europeans—were evolutionarily more advanced than the black races, thus establishing race differences and a racial hierarchy."''' [Emphasis added.]::::::Therefore, I think it's proper to remove Note VI from the bio.::::::''NB:'' This casts no aspersions on Darwin, but only tells when and where he lived. YoPienso (talk) 00:55, 1 January 2016 (UTC):::::::Thank you for these sources. I really appreciate it. I have made the deletion. Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 02:44, 1 January 2016 (UTC)::::::::You're welcome. I meant to remove ''the first line'' from Note VI, which I have now done. YoPienso (talk) 03:04, 1 January 2016 (UTC)As discussed below, the "higher races of man" were likely to have been cultural rather than biological, but CD didn't have that modern distinction. The other tow sources are reviews of ''Darwin's Sacred Cause'',  (should be a free download) discusses among other things how "Because of the rapport [CD and Edmonton] developed, young Darwin learned firsthand that “black and white men possessed the same essential humanity.” " There are more sources discussing this rather complex topic. . dave souza, talk 18:52, 2 January 2016 (UTC):Please see discussion in section "Darwin on racial inferiority" Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 20:13, 6 January 2016 (UTC)Darwin was not a racistThanks for providing a secondary source in the above discussion. That looks useful as a source for the point that "Darwin was not a racist. He did not, unlike many of his contemporaries, think human 'races' might be separate creations. He was a staunch abolitionist, impressed and influenced by his friend and taxidermy tutor John Edmonstone at Edinburgh, who was a freed black slave."*Adam Rutherford is well qualified as a science author and geneticist, so his views appear worthwhile though he's not a specialist Darwin biographer. Apparently he's in the process of [writing a book] which will discuss this topic area. He makes the interesting point "that while Galton spawned a field with the intention of revealing essential racial differences between the peoples of the Earth, his legacy – human genetics – has shown he was wrong. Most modern geneticists are much less like Galton and more like Darwin." As mentioned above, a footnote adds that an "earlier version said Darwin did not think human races might be separate sub-species. In fact he did refer to human races as sub-species." This is a complex area, and needs clarification from further sources. More later. . . dave souza, talk 18:33, 30 December 2015 (UTC):"Most modern geneticists are … like Darwin" and "[Darwin] did refer to human races as sub-species".  From this we can infer that you're saying that most modern geneticists refer to human races as sub-species.  Very interesting!  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 20:47, 30 December 2015 (UTC)::You are WP:SYNTHesizing stuff, we don't do that.  Dbrodbeck (talk) 21:28, 30 December 2015 (UTC)follow up complaint1. When Adam Rutherford’s article first came out last year, I was shocked both at how he brazenly lied about Darwin saying that humans have diverged into distinct subspecies and how he ignored comments posted to the article pointing out that this was not true.  It took some time to get the courage to complain, and although the Guardian totally ignored my first complaint, they eventually amended the article on that point.  I had also pointed out that Darwin had mentioned humans in ''OTOOS'', but it seems that Rutherford told the Guardian that even though Darwin had “mentioned” humans, Darwin hadn’t “discussed” humans in ''OTOOS''.  I have come to see more clearly what a load of WP:BULLSHIT this is.  I have again complained to the Guardian / Observer, sending a second when I didn’t hear back from the first, which you can check out if interested:Letter to Guardian, February 2Dear Barbara Harper and/or other complaints editors,In this complaint, I am asking you (the Guardian) to correct 2 inaccuracies from the article ''Why racism is not backed by science'', which you published on March 1, 2015. The problematic sentence states, “Of course, Darwin doesn’t discuss humans in that great book, and ‘races’ was used to describe groups within non-human species.” Here Adam Rutherford is making the following 2 false claims: (A) that Darwin did not discuss humans at all in the ''Origin of Species'', and (B) that Darwin never referred to human races in the ''Origin of Species''.The original article also claimed that Darwin didn’t think that human races were separate subspecies. In fact, Darwin had clearly indicated his belief that they were. On June 1, I wrote in to complain about all 3 misrepresentations. My first email letter was ignored so I sent in another complaint on June 24. My second letter was very strongly worded and focused on the particularly egregious subspecies claim. That time I got a response from you, although Mr. Rutherford has never contacted me as he indicated to you he would. The article was amended on June 29, acknowledging that Darwin had referred to human races as subspecies.  This was a huge improvement and I did not pursue the other 2 misrepresentations further at that time.I have since become much more familiar with ''Origin of Species''.  I have also recently spent time editing and correcting misrepresentations about Charles Darwin on Wikipedia and have become personally acquainted with some brazen dishonesty from editors there who want to present a particular image of Darwin to the world. Following are some of the ways in which the 2 disputed claims are explicitly false:''Claim A''. Discuss means to talk about.  Here are 4 ways that Darwin talks about or discusses humans in ''Origin of Species''. (1) Darwin talked many times about the ability of humans to select for traits in domesticated animals and plants. (2) Darwin described sexual selection and stated that it applied to humans (''Origin'', 1859, page 199; see his description of this: ''Descent of Man'', Ed 2, 1874, page vi). (3) Darwin compared the human hand with appendages of other mammals on several occasions, such as when he wrote, “The framework of bones being the same in the '''hand of a man''', wing of a bat, fin of the porpoise, and leg of the horse … at once explain themselves on the theory of descent with … modifications” (emphasis added, ''Origin'', 1859, page 479). (4) Darwin wrote that by future research, “Light will be thrown on the '''origin of man''' and his history” (emphasis added, ''Origin'', 1859, page 488; see his description of this: ''Descent of Man'', page 1).  Any defence based on the claim that Darwin ''mentioned'' humans without ''talking about'' them at all in ''Origin of Species'' is completely bogus and absurd.''Claim B''. Darwin used the term “races of man” 3 times in his first edition of ''Origin of Species''. (Please go to Darwin Online and search it for yourself.) On page 199, Darwin stated that the differences between the “races of man” are “so strongly marked” and he wrote that sexual selection would shine light on these differences (''Origin'', 1859, page 199). Darwin described this claim in the introduction of the ''Descent of Man'': “During many years it has seemed to me highly probable that sexual selection has played an important part in differentiating the races of man; but in my 'Origin of Species' (first edition, p. 199) I contented myself by merely alluding to this belief” (''Descent'', page 2). While it is true that he discussed human races in much much greater detail in the ''Descent of Man'', it is completely false to claim that he never described human groups as races in the ''Origin of Species''.I don’t know why this dishonesty make me so angry. Maybe it is the sheer stupidity of thinking that race problems will go away if we pretend that race doesn’t exist. Regardless of why though, I hope we can agree that these misrepresentations of the most important book in the science of biology do make me extremely annoyed.As a point of interest, I would strongly advise someone to read the ''Descent of Man'' very carefully before publishing claims that Darwin wasn’t racist. I’m thinking of his fascinating discussion on innate ability to reason. He uses the example of searching for water in a desert to compare and contrast the reasoning abilities of a cultivated man, a savage, and a dog (''Descent'', Ed 2, 1874, pages 75-77). Another gem is his discussion of the “immorality of savages” (''Descent'', Ed 2, 1874, pages 116-121).  But this is a digression.Considering that my first complaint on June 1 was not responded to, I would very much appreciate if you would reply back to me, acknowledging five points: (1) receipt of this complaint, (2) that the article claimed that Darwin didn’t discuss humans in ''Origin of Species'', (3) that the article claimed that Darwin didn’t make any reference to human races in ''Origin of Species'', (4) that Darwin actually did discuss humans in ''Origin of Species'', and (5) that Darwin did refer to human races in ''Origin of Species''.I look forward to hearing from you on the issues raised here.Sincerely,Stan GiesbrechtLetter to both Guardian and Observer, February 5Dear Guardian / Observer editors,I emailed in a letter on February 2 in which I disputed 2 claims made in ''Why racism is not backed by science''. Even though your website says that you respond to complaints in 72 hours and it has been well over 72 hours, I have not heard back from anyone in your organization.Darwin’s book, ''On the Origin of Species'', is the most important publication in all of biology. It is a major scientific fraud to misrepresent scientific evidence to support some scientific claim. '''Given the seriousness of the misconduct here, I am asking very insistently that you reply back to me promptly, advising me on the status of your inquiry and who is involved in the process'''.Please advise me if I can be of any assistance for you to access ''On the Origin of Species''. It’s freely available on the interwebs.  You can go to Darwin Online and can use Ctrl-F to find words or phrases. Please advise me if you need more information on Darwin talking about humans in ''Origin of Species'' or referring to human races in the same. For example, on page 382 (Ed 1, 1859), Darwin refers to “savage races of man” to draw a comparison to the distribution of groups of other life forms. So here, he is clearly using “races” to describe groups ''within the human species'', something your article explicitly ''claims he never did''.If you have responded to this email address, I haven’t received it. Please message me at 1-xxx-xxx-xxxx.  Thank you for your attention in this very important matter.Sincerely,Stan Giesbrecht2. I have just now heard back from the Guardian, advising me that this was an Observer article, and they only now sent the first letter to the Observer.  Fantastic stall tactic.  You may say that I’m a dreamer, but I hope and trust that they will do the right thing here… but it might need a bit of pressure.3. The main point I wabt to make here is what Filanca  some years back: most secondary sources on Darwin are biased, some too critical and some too apologetic, and not too many that are trustworthy.  This is in line with my post below where I point out that ''Power of Place'' cannot be trusted as a reliable source.  Most of Darwin’s works are freely available online, so there really is no excuse to post anything inconsistent with what he wrote.4. Filanca had been trying to remove a line claiming that “Darwin did not share the racism at that time”, which was unsourced propaganda that needed to be deleted.  When he made good faith proposals for editing the article, other editors refused to have a rational discussion.  They hit on cheap talking points, used smoke screens and red herrings to distract him, and accused him of misrepresenting the facts without explaining how he might have been misrepresenting the facts (see the disccusion Talk:Charles_Darwin/Archive_7#Darwin.27s_racism|here, see also WP:BULLY).5. Wikipedia has an essay on this phenomenon (WP:Walled Garden), although there, they are referring to a number of wiki pages that only refer to each other, whereas here we are talking about numerous publications on Darwin that get false information from each other, thus reinforcing this very same false information, and when someone points out that this is contradicted by Darwin’s own writings, they are aggressively attacked, told to shut up, and told to drink the WP:KOOLAID, thus maintaining the Garden Wall and protecting the Garden from reality.6. This is not what Jimmy Wales wants.  He is a great guy and he trusts our judgement when  “Zero information is preferred to misleading or false information”.  If it is too complex for us editors to understand, it shouldn’t be on Wikipedia, no matter what some beloved secondary source may say. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 23:28, 10 February 2016 (UTC):You're conflating modern ideas of racism with Darwin's acknowledgement that there are varieties of humans, the so-called races. He was clearly against the racism supporting slavery and the racism of polygenism, while at the same time he regarded different human cultures as having differing value, with his own ideal being humanitarian European ideas of his time. You're also accusing Wikipedia editors of dishonesty, which is contrary to policies of WP: NPA and WP:AGF, so please take more care to be collegiate. . . . dave souza, talk 09:21, 11 February 2016 (UTC)Poor sourceDave souza, I'm wondering why you restored the link to a [poor source]: an [amateur historian]'s webpage. I accidentally removed a link to Desmond and Moore 1991, which David J. Wilson quickly restored. (Thanks!) Darwin's burial in Westminster Abbey is not the least bit controversial and doesn't need multiple citations. Imo, citing to Leff cheapens our article.  YoPienso (talk) 15:43, 2 January 2016 (UTC):I should have included: The link I provided to Westminster Abbey's own site says, "The chief mourners then followed the coffin into the north aisle of the Nave where Darwin was buried next to the eminent scientist Sir John Herschel, and a few feet away from Sir Isaac Newton." So there's no need to turn to Leff for placement. YoPienso (talk) 16:38, 2 January 2016 (UTC)::Westminster Abbey's page does indeed cover the points in writing, and it's an excellent new source. However, I feel Leff's page provides accessible detail about the occasion, and images showing the location. It's not essential, but in my view provides useful online context. . dave souza, talk 17:28, 2 January 2016 (UTC):::I see. This presents a common WP dilemma--the choice between an informative but low-quality source or a less informative, more reputable one. A FA is supposed to have "high-quality reliable sources". But I've been unable to turn up an online source nearly as informative as Leff. . We have [this in Commons], but Darwin's grave isn't labeled. Surely there's a print source! Meanwhile, we seem to agree with a scholarly Scot that a guess (low quality source) is better than a gap. ("When the choice lay between , I inclined to prefer the former, feeling that the ordinary reader for whom this version is designed would have a proper dislike of gaps.";::::Forgot to sign. YoPienso (talk) 22:24, 2 January 2016 (UTC)Darwin on racial inferiorityIt seems that at some juncture some caretaker of Darwin's reputation added incorrect info that he didn't perceive racial inferiority. In the "Difference between races" section,  several RSs that show he did. There still remains a passage to be corrected, ''To Darwin, the difference showed cultural advances, not racial inferiority. Unlike his scientist friends, he now thought there was no unbridgeable gap between humans and animals.(Harvnb|Browne|1995|pp= 244–250).'' I don't have access to the source, but rather doubt it denies Darwin saw racial inferiority. Desmond and Moore, in ''Darwin: The Life of a Tormented Evolutionist,'' p. ''xxi,'' say, "He thought blacks inferior but was sickened by slavery."How can we fix that passage?I want to reiterate that this is no attack on Darwin. His thought was far ahead of his day. It's unrealistic to expect 21st-century sensibilities in a Victorian, but it's wrong to ascribe them to him when he didn't possess them. YoPienso (talk) 16:00, 2 January 2016 (UTC):I'm currently looking at several sources: it's a bit complex, and to add to it CD's views changed over time. I don't have Desmond and Moore's ''Darwin: The Life of a Tormented Evolutionist'' as that's the U.S. edition of their publication which appeared earlier in the UK as ''Darwin'' (paperback 1992), presumably the title was extended to make it more exciting. The intro only goes up to p. xix, it does include that sentence. There's more detail in their intro to ''The Descent of Man'' and in their more recent ''Darwin's Sacred Cause'' which has on p. 26 "These weeks with John [Edmonstone] confirmed Darwin's belief that black and white men possessed the same essential humanity. Later in life he would say that the races he encountered during his voyage on the ''Beagle'', no less than the 'negro with whom I happened once to be intimate', obviously shared 'so many little traits of character with himself'. I showed 'how similar their minds were to ours'. Coming from a family which had campaigned to emancipate Britain's colonial slaves, and obeying the abolitionist command to honour black people as 'equal humans', young Darwin had been happy to be taught by a 'full-blooded negro'."  As the reviews you've posted note, Desmond ; Moore's research is good but their views may be rather controversial. Browne gives a more balanced overview, so in my opinion is a good starting point. Regarding the race issue, it's difficult to show it concisely in context: remember Darwin's "favoured races" were illustrated by discussion of . We cite John Wilkins' published writings, his own  discusses the "organic chain" idea and his view that "Darwin doesn’t tell the difference between culture and biology. He has no ''nature/nurture'' distinction, and neither did anyone else much until the rise of genetics forty years after the ''Origin''." Also, note that Darwin is often quoting others such as his uni chum William Rathbone Greg (there's an article needing improvement), and takes seriously their views which were progressive at the time, but now would be seen as very politically incorrect. So yes, my aim is to rethink the coverage, but am rather slow and don't find it straightforward. More later. . dave souza, talk 18:28, 2 January 2016 (UTC)::Yes, it's very complex. Even the definition of "racism" is--according to an African-American niece and Native American friends, I'm automatically racist because I was born with white privilege. These new sensibilities fog the historical lens. As Wilkins wrote, "He concedes to the racism of his peers, but its a ''cultural'' racism, not a biological one, I think. Darwin is not so much a racist as he is a Eurocentrist. Of course, racism need not be at all biological to be racism."::There is no question Darwin thought Englishmen were superior to Africans and Indians. He was progressive in seeing essential humanity in each person he met, and particularly in being willing to be taught by an African. (In contrast, when our schools were forcibly integrated in the 1960s, many Southerners were still unwilling to submit to being taught--or having their children taught--by African-Americans.) But I think the record is clear that Darwin didn't consider non-Europeans ''equal.'' The problem is how to write an accurate article without writing an essay on racism!::Wrt cabbages, Golding knew that people also "revert to the wild aboriginal stock." YoPienso (talk) 22:06, 2 January 2016 (UTC)::1. I will address 3 points raised by Dave Souza and present evidence: 1) that Darwin ''included'' humans in the term “favoured races”, 2) that Wilkin’s article actually shows that Darwin believed in racial superiority and inferiority, and 3) that Desmond and Moore are credible when the write that Darwin thought blacks inferior.::2. ''Favoured Races''. Darwin described natural selection happening through the preservation of favoured races.(Origin, 1859, page 467)  He believed that humans were very much part of the same process and not just cabbages, as has been alluded to. Darwin used the term “races of man” 3 times in Origin of Species.  He also explicitly referenced humans in Origin of Species at least twice, describing these references in the Descent of Man: (1) “It seemed to me sufficient to indicate, in the first edition of my 'Origin of Species,' that by this work "light would be thrown on the "origin of man and his history;" and '''this implies that man must be included with other organic beings''' in any general conclusion respecting his manner of appearance on this earth.”(emphasis added, Descent, 1874, page 1) and (2) “it has been said by several critics, that when I found that many details of structure in man could not be explained through natural selection, I invented sexual selection; I gave, however, a tolerably clear sketch of this principle in the first edition of the 'Origin of Species,' and '''I there stated that it was applicable to man'''.”(emphasis added, Descent, 1874, page vi)::3. In the Descent of Man, Darwin discusses the extinction of “many races and sub-races”(Descent, 1874, page 181) quite extensively, showing that he considered the preservation and extinction of human races to follow the same laws of nature as other species.::4. ''The Wilkins article'' you cited insinuates that Darwin didn’t think apes were closer to Australians than they were to Europeans.  But what the title actually claims is that Darwin didn’t think Australians were closer to apes than they were to Europeans.  This is, of course, true.  Darwin thought there was a ''much bigger'' gap between apes and Australians than between Australians and Europeans.  But Wilkins is trying to conflate the 2 very different points and avoid the real issue.  He does this throughout the article; there is no real substance here.::5. Wilkins acknowledges that “[Darwin] arrays human variation from ‘civilised’ to ‘savage’, with Europeans at one end, and great apes at the other.”  But then Wilkins claims that “[Darwin] clearly doesn’t need this – as far as he is concerned, according to his theory of common descent '''all human races must be equally evolved'''”.(emphasis added)  This is incorrect for 3 reasons: (1) It does not follow from Darwin’s theory of common descent that all human races must be equally evolved.  Darwin recognized that all animals shared common descent, yet Darwin clearly saw some as more evolved than others.  As mentioned above, this is how Darwin saw nature selection happening: by the preservation of favoured races, and this includes humans.  (2) Wilkins is employing the fallacy of begging the question.  He assumes the issue he is trying to prove, and then uses that assumption to prove his conclusion. Whether or not Darwin saw all human races as equally evolved is exactly what he set out to prove, and now he just baldly asserts it here.  (3) Darwin wrote, “At the present day civilised nations are everywhere supplanting barbarous nations, excepting where the climate opposes a deadly barrier; and '''they succeed mainly''', though not exclusively, '''through''' their arts, which are '''the products of the intellect'''. '''It is;/u;, therefore, highly probable that with mankind the intellectual faculties have been mainly and gradually perfected through natural selection;/u;'''; and this conclusion is sufficient for our purpose.”(emphasis added, Descent, 1874, page 128)  In other words, Darwin is saying that it is “highly probable” that some races are more evolved by natural selection than others.::6. Wilkins quote the common passage from Chapter 6 about the break in the organic chain and claims that “The argument given here is not one of progress but of taxonomy.”  This is a false dichotomy fallacy.  The fact that there Darwin discusses taxonomy does not preclude him from discussing progress.  And in fact, Darwin refers to “some ape as low as a baboon” which is proof that his argument is about ''both'' taxonomy and progress on the organic scale.::7. Wilkins claims that it is a “failing” that “Darwin doesn’t tell the difference between culture and biology”. He writes that Darwin “concedes to the racism of his peers, but its a ''cultural'' racism” but then goes on to say that “racism need not be at all biological to be racism” thus proving that whether the racism was biological or cultural or some mix, Darwin was expressing some form of racial superiority and inferiority.::8. Wilkins also says that it is “unfortunate” that Darwin used the term “organic chain” and says a couple of times that Darwin was “confused”.  But the important point is that Darwin wrote what he wrote.  We are not discussing issues that Darwin mentions in passing, but things that he wrote extensively on.  It’s not relevant to our discussion that Wilkins finds it inconvenient.::9. ''Desmond and Moore'' write that Darwin recognized that all humans possessed “essential humanity”.  But believing in essential humanity is different than thinking everyone is the same.  Darwin wrote, “The variability or diversity of the mental faculties in men of the same race, not to mention '''the greater differences between the men of distinct races''', is so notorious that not a word need here be said. So it is with the lower animals.”(emphasis added, Descent, 1874, page 27)  This shows that Darwin did see differences between the races even if all people had essential humanity.::10. Desmond and Moore might be controversial on some points, but their claim that Darwin thought blacks inferior is well supported by many primary, secondary, and tertiary sources. You say you find Browne to have a more balanced view, but on this point Desmond and Moore's view is supported by more sources. Furthermore, it is not clear that the author of the line “To Darwin, the difference showed cultural advances, not racial inferiority” really sourced this to Browne, as the citation is on the ''following'' sentence.  I don’t have access to her book, so I cannot check to see what Browne actually wrote, but given how this claim is contradicted by so many sources, I think the author probably took Browne's work out of context if he or she used Browne at all.::11. ''In conclusion'', these 3 points you raise actually push towards removing the phrase, “not racial inferiority”.  Darwin clearly included humans in his discussions in Origin of Species which identified favoured races as leading to natural selection. Wilkins acknowledges that Darwin was expressing racial inferiority, even if the biological/cultural divide isn’t necessarily clear.  And Desmond and Moore are credible when they write that Darwin thought blacks were inferior.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 16:29, 3 January 2016 (UTC):::I think we can trust Desmond, with "a Ph.D. in the area of the Victorian-period context of Darwinian evolution." He was tapped by the ''Encyclopedia Britannica'' to write the , in which he says, "Darwin was a typical Victorian in his racial and sexual stereotyping—however dependent on his redoubtable wife, he still thought women inferior; and although a fervent abolitionist, he still considered blacks a lower race." Check out his [publisher's blurb].:::This doesn't mean we have to accept Desmond ; Moore's thesis in ''Sacred Cause'' (but why not?) or castigate Darwin for living in the 1800s. YoPienso (talk) 17:25, 3 January 2016 (UTC)::::Couple of interim thoughts: Desmond and Moore are certainly experts, if sometimes controversial. The sentences we're discussing above aren't  Victorian-period, and as Desmond says in ''Britannica''; "His contact with 'untamed' humans on Tierra del Fuego in December 1832 unsettled him more. How great, wrote Darwin, the 'difference between savage ; civilized man is.—It is greater than between a wild ; [a] domesticated animal.' God had evidently created humans in a vast cultural range, and yet, judging by the Christianized savages aboard, even the “lowest” races were capable of improvement." If you read through that source, he indicates that Darwin's ideas of egalitarianism varied over time; by 1837 there "was no way of ranking humans and bees, no yardstick of 'highness': man was no longer the crown of creation."  On the meeting with the Fuegians, see Desmond ; Moore's ''Darwin'' [life of tormented etc.] p. 147: "Although essentially the same creature, Darwin conceded, remembering the civilized Jemmy and his friends, 'how little must the mind of one of these beings resemble that of an educated man.' It all seemed to fly in Lyell's face – Lyell, who damned talk of monkeys and savages and philosophers linked in an evolutionary chain." .... Lyell thought "Human beings might be diverse, but they showed only slight deviation from a common standard." . . dave souza, talk 19:37, 3 January 2016 (UTC):::::1. I can't even figure out what you are trying to say. Lyell thought that humans “showed only slight deviation from a common standard” and what Darwin believed “seemed to fly in Lyell's face”.  So, the inference here is that Darwin believed that humans diverged widely? This is ''not'' an argument for keeping the disputed line ''"not racial inferiority"'' which refers to Darwin's views of the Fuegians, and stands in stark contrast to the Descent of Man where Darwin wrote, "The Fuegians rank amongst the lowest barbarians”.(1874, page 65)  Based on what you wrote here, you seem to be acknowledging that Darwin believed in racial inferiority in 1832, but then are claiming that he changed his mind on this by 1837, before he reverted back to believing in racial inferiority when he wrote the Descent.:::::2. The disputed line claims that Darwin thought the differences were cultural, not racial.  This is comparing apples and oranges.  As your source, , writes, cultural racism is still racism.  Thus, it is a false dichotomy.  Darwin often referred to the "savage races" so differences definitely could be ''both'' cultural and racial to him.:::::3. By your own admission, this is a complicated area.  These are all major ''red flags'' which establish that we are dealing with an WP:EXTRAORDINARY claim.  Wikipedia policy states that “Exceptional claims require exceptional sources” and “Any exceptional claim requires ''multiple'' high-quality sources.” (emphasis in original).  So, even if this line is sourced to Browne, and there is no evidence that it actually is, it still wouldn't meet the WP:BURDEN, which states, “The '''burden to demonstrate verifiability lies with the editor who adds or restores material''', and is satisfied by providing a citation to a reliable source that directly supports the contribution.” (emphasis in original):::::4. Furthermore, even if the claim can be verified by multiple high quality sources, “Verifiability does not guarantee inclusion” (WP:ONUS).  One of the fundamental principles of Wikipedia is a neutral point of view (WP:NPOV).  According to Wikipedia, “This policy is non-negotiable, and the principles upon which it is based cannot be superseded by other policies or guidelines, nor by editor consensus.”  The page in a nutshell states, “Articles must not ''take'' sides, but should ''explain'' the sides, fairly and without editorial bias.” (emphasis in original).  The article does not explain both sides.  There clearly is an editorial bias.  Darwin wrote extensively about the higher and lower races on man in the Descent of Man. It would be absurd in the extreme to give more weight to his personal notebooks than to his second most famous work which he writes specifically to deal with these types of issues (WP:UNDUE).  The article would otherwise need to include this discussion to present a balanced NPOV.:::::5. To recap, the line ''"not racial inferiority"'' needs to be removed from, ''"To Darwin, the difference showed cultural advances, not racial inferiority"'' for the article to meet Wikipedia’s high standards. First, numerous red flags show that it is an exceptional claim, which requires multiple high-quality sources. Second, it takes a side which violates the NPOV principle.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 22:54, 5 January 2016 (UTC)*I've edited the paragraph for clarifications that CD didn't believe in inherent racial inferiority citing , for "Both FitzRoy and Darwin ... were absolutely certain that all human beings came from the same stock – that there had been only one original species of mankind, however diverse human beings now appeared to be – and recoiled from the idea that primitive races wee intrinsically different" and comments on improvement. Similar points are made by   . . dave souza, talk 11:44, 6 January 2016 (UTC)::1. Your edit links “''inherent racial inferiority''” to polygenism.  You clearly don’t understand what it means.  From the link: “'''Polygenism''' is a theory of human origins positing that the human races are of different origins (''polygenesis''). This is opposite to the idea of monogenism, which posits a single origin of humanity”.  There is nothing here about racial inferiority because that is not what polygenism is about.  Darwin explains this in the Descent of Man, as I've already pointed out to you.  I’m not sure you should be editing on this particular subject if you don’t understand the difference (WP:CIR).::2. Janet Browne wrote that Darwin “recoiled from the idea that primitive races [were] intrinsically different” and from this you synthesize the claim that Darwin thought the differences were not “''inherent racial inferiority''”.  This is WP:ORIGINAL research: “The only way you can show your edit is not original research is to cite a reliable published source that contains the same material. Even with well-sourced material, if you use it out of context, or to reach or imply a conclusion not ''directly and explicitly'' supported by the source, you are engaging in original research” (emphasis in original).  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 16:25, 6 January 2016 (UTC):::1. While I think that link covers well the issues of polygenism and ideas of inherent racial inferiority, it may be better to phrase this to show CD's recommitment to monogenism. That article's currently rather poor, so a task to improve it.  As already pointed out, ''Descent'' is a primary source and not the best source for CD's views on the ''Beagle''.2. There's a lot of context all confirming CD's opposition to polygenism and to slavery, this article is a brief outline aiming to reflect accurately secondary sources rather than your original research from primary sources. . .  dave souza, talk 17:34, 6 January 2016 (UTC)::::1. First you link the article on polygenism and say it covers the issues well, then you say it’s poorly written, so that’s clear as mud.::::2. I have never disputed Darwin’s opposition to polygenism or slavery nor asked for them to not be reported. Your desire “to show CD's recommitment to monogenism” does not, of course, represent a neutral point of view.  Words such as “remained convinced” and “despite this diversity” represent WP:EDITORIALIZING. Nobody doubts that humans have the potential for improvement, so the line about that is pure excess.  (As a point of grammar, you are missing “had” in “He remained convinced that … all humans … potential for improvement” which I’m not correcting because I think "potential for improvement" should be deleted entirely.)::::3. The ''Descent of Man'' is Darwin’s second most important work and should not be dismissed out of hand.  The article needs to accurately reflect ''both'' reliable secondary ''and'' primary sources.  With all that said, we have cleaned up some major inaccuracies here, which I’m thankful for, and I don’t have time right now to deal with NPOV violations.  Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 20:13, 6 January 2016 (UTC)Multiple references to humans in ''OTOOS''1. Dave Souza, you are edit-warring. Wikipedia policy is to have bold edits and when disagreements lead to reversion, to discuss the disagreements on the talk page (WP:BRD). Unfortunately, you have a  of reverting edits without the required discussion, so that's a problem.2. You reverted my addition that Darwin's line about light being thrown on man's origin implied that humans shared common ancestry with other animals. This is exactly what Darwin said in ''TDOM'' and the quote is included in Footnote III. While most of ''TDOM'' is a primary source, Darwin's WP:ANALYSIS of ''OTOOS'' there is secondary. Thus, the information in my edit comes from a secondary source, and it is hard to think of a more reliable source for the contents of ''OTOOS'' than what Darwin himself reported that it said.3. All my other edits that you reverted were exceptional claims. According to Darwin himself, he wrote in ''OTOOS'' that sexual selection applies to humans, yet you claim that this is somehow not an allusion to human origins. You cite Browne, but given the recent edits by Yopienso, I am quite skeptical that Browne actually said that. Earlier, we had a discussion where you were challenged about your claim that Darwin didn't perceive racial inferiority. In response, you claimed that , before acknowledging that she actually . These are huge ''red flags'' that you are making an exceptional claim which requires "''multiple'' high-quality sources" (emphasis in original, WP:EXCEPTIONAL). So, until that happens, it is not acceptable for the article to say that ''OTOOS'' only made one allusion to human origins. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 00:31, 18 January 2016 (UTC):Both pages of Browne's ''The Power of Place'' cited in the passage under dispute are accessible (at least to me) in the Google books copy  (, ).   Here are some of the relevant statements from p.60::*"With profound deliberation, however, he did not include the two difficulties that would have occured to everybody.  He avoided talking about the origin of human beings and he avoided God.":*"In this book, he was completely silent on the subject of human origins, although in several places he did refer to mankind as an example of biological details.52  The only words he allowed himself—and these out of a sense of duty that he must somewhere refer to human beings—were gnomic in their brevity.  "Light will be thrown on the origin of man and his history,"  he declared in the conclusion.":It must be borne in mind, however, that Browne was here explicitly referring to the ''first edition'' of ''On the Origin of Species'', and it cannot be assumed that she would necessarily have said the same thing about later editions.:In my opinion Darwin's remark about sexual selection's being responsible for "the differences between the races of man" does ''not'' constitute a clear reference to ''the origins of man'', and the claim that it does  is specious.   The latter term explicitly covers the notion that ''Homo sapiens'' is a descendent of a ''different'' species of ape, whereas the differences between the races of man are merely differences ''within'' that species, so a reference to the origins of those differences can at most be considered as being one to evolution ''within'' the species, and ''not'' as a reference to ''the actual origin'' of the species.:User:David_J_Wilson|DavidWilson(talk·Special:Contributions/David_J_Wilson|cont);03:45, 18 January 2016 (UTC)::1. Thank you for providing the links to Browne’s book. Unfortunately, I only got content for p.87 and not p.60, so I appreciate the statements that you provided.::2. In the passages quoted from ''TDOM'' that are included in Note III, Darwin also explicitly refers to the first edition of ''OTOOS,'' so the edition isn't an issue.::3. You are suggesting that I am claiming that Darwin’s reference to sexual selection in OTOOS is a "''clear reference to the origins of man''" and this is simply not the case. I removed the disputed claim which stated that there was ''only one "allusion to human origins"'' in ''OTOOS''. Wikipedia is absolutely clear that the burden to demonstrate verifiability lies with the editor who restores material (WP:PROVEIT). Thus, I am not here to argue that Darwin’s comment on sexual selection was such an allusion. Darwin had other references to humans, and I am claiming that you have not proven that none of these references, with only the one exception, could be construed as alluding to the origins of humans in any way. Arguably, the reference to sexual selection alludes to the fact that humans have evolved and this alludes to the fact that humans have common ancestry with other animals, which is an allusion to human origins. I am not even saying this is a strong argument, but if you cannot conclusively disprove it, then the disputed statement cannot be included in the article.::4. Browne writes “In this book, he was completely silent on the subject of human origins”. Yet Darwin wrote in ''TDOM'' that, "It seemed to me sufficient to indicate, in the first edition of my 'Origin of Species,' that by this work 'light would be thrown on the origin of man and his history;' and this implies that man must be included with other organic beings in any general conclusion respecting his manner of appearance on this earth."(see note III) Thus, according to Darwin himself, he was ''not'' completely silent on that subject. This shows that there is too much ambiguity on the subject to use Browne as a source for this exceptional claim. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 06:28, 18 January 2016 (UTC):::Implying something isn't the same as stating something. Darwin was silent on the origins while hinting that the reader could put 2 and 2 together. Janet Browne has impeccable credentials and makes complete sense; I'd say she is a very reliable source. . [Ken Weiss] [agrees] with her. [Here's] the preview of a paper quoting several experts on Darwin's silence. And for Darwin on Darwin: "You ask whether I shall discuss “man”;—I think I shall avoid whole subject, as so surrounded with prejudices, though I fully admit that it is the highest ; most interesting problem for the naturalist." (, Dec.22, 1857.)The claim isn't exceptional at all but is general knowledge.:::About note III--clicking on the superscript doesn't take the reader to the note. YoPienso (talk) 08:59, 18 January 2016 (UTC)::::1. Thank you for the link to p.60. This time it worked. I don’t understand why the link to Footnote III doesn’t work for you. The superscript numbers 1 and 2 work for me. Maybe someone else can help.::::2. Darwin’s letter to Wallace (presumably) represented his intention ''at that time,'' but it’s clear that when he actually wrote ''OTOOS'', he did ''not'' avoid the subject entirely. I agree that implying something isn’t the same as stating it, but it’s not the same as staying completely silent either. An encyclopedia with multiple editors does not have the same ability to make fine semantic distinctions in the way that a single-author book can. I maintain that it is inappropriate to say on Wikipedia that Darwin was silent on something, only to add later that he wasn’t actually quite totally silent on the matter. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 12:49, 18 January 2016 (UTC):::The claim I was referring to in the second paragraph of my above comments was the edit summary of this edit where you wrote:::::"saying that sexual selection applies to humans is an allusion to human origins".:::While this edit summary does not say that the suposed allusion to human origins was ''clear'', it neverthelesss appears to me to be the only justification you have offered for your edit, which removed the assertion that Darwin's statement, "light will be thrown on the origin of man and his history", is the only such allusion in ''On the Origin of Species''.   Since that assertion is properly supported by an accurate citation to an unequivocally reliable source (viz. Browne's ''The Power of Place''), your edit would only be justified if the statement that sexual selection applies to humans constituted a ''clear and unequivocal'' allusion to human origins, which, in my opinion it does not, for the reasons I have given above.   Since the claim made by the assertion is not at all exceptional (as Yopienso points out in his comments above), the burden of demonstrating its verifiability is quite properly met by the citation to Browne,   However, the assertion does also seem to me to be well supported by the statement of Darwin's that you have quoted from ''The Descent of Man'', which I now requote with some of the preceding context:::::"During many years I collected notes on the origin or descent of man, ''without any intention of publishing on the subject'' [emphasis mine], but rather with the determination not to publish, as I thought that I should thus only add to the prejudices against my views. ''It seemed to me sufficient to indicate'' [emphasis mine], in the first edition of my 'Origin of Species,' that by this work "light would be thrown on the "origin of man and his history;" and this implies that man must be included with other organic beings in any general conclusion respecting his manner of appearance on this earth.":::While the key words, which I have emphasisd in the above quotation, perhaps do not quite imply that the "light will be thrown" statement is absolutely the ''only'' one in ''On the Origin of Species'' referring to the origins of man, they seem to me to come pretty damn close.:::Browne's statement that the first edition of ''On the Origin of Species'' was "completely silent on the subject of human origins" does not appear to me to be obviously inconsistent with Darwin's statement that "light will be thrown on the origin of man and his history".  Saying that light will be thrown on something says nothing whatever about what that light will reveal about the something in question.  Given the context of Browne's remark, I expect that that's all she meant when she said the book was completely silent on the subject, although I do agree that she could have expressed herself more clearly.  But in any case, neither the statement that ''On the Origin of Species'' was "completely silent on the subject of human origins", nor anything which implies it, as far as I can see, currently appears in the article.  I certainly would not propose that it be added, and Yopienso doesn't appear to be arguing that it should be either.:::On the issue of how little discussion of human origins there is in ''On the Origin of Species'', to the references cited by Yopienso above I can add Desmond and Moore's ''Darwin'', in which :::::"Even in 1859 he [i.e. Darwin] had to be prodded into publishing ''The Origin of Species'' , and then he let it go with barely a hint about human origins.":::On the issue of Browne's reliability, I can offer Talk:Charles_Darwin/Archive_9#djwjbreliable| this survey of reviews in reliable sources which I carried out some years ago in response to another editor's challenging it.:::User:David_J_Wilson|DavidWilson(talk·Special:Contributions/David_J_Wilson|cont);16:10, 18 January 2016 (UTC)::::So much talk, and still all the secondary sources indicate that Darwin confined discussion of human origins to that one sentence.  Clarification re Browne p. 60, she writes “In this book, he was completely silent on the subject of human origins, although he did refer in several places to mankind as an example of biological details. The only words he allowed himself .... were gnomic in their brevity. 'Light will be thrown on the origin of man'." There's that sentence, picked out by multiple sources.  Stan Giesbrecht is claiming that there are other allusions to the topic but, so far, has failed to produce a secondary source supporting that claim.  . . dave souza, talk 17:28, 18 January 2016 (UTC):::::User:Stan Giesbrecht The word "silent" is being used to mean Darwin did not directly address human origins. [Kathy J. Cooke] phrases it very well: "Darwin was convinced that natural selection had worked on man, but he decided not to say so explicitly--he intended to be silent on the topic of human evolution." The author quoting her continues, "She says that we can find implicit references to the evolutionary origins of mankind in his book." Browne lists Cooke's article on the Bajema-Bowler debate in the bibliography, p. 541. YoPienso (talk) 19:09, 18 January 2016 (UTC)1. YoPienso, I feel like you are proving my point. The fact that you need to explain what “silent” means shows that it is qualified. We cannot use a literal meaning of “completely silent” to understand Janet Browne's line “In this book, he was completely silent on the subject of human origins”.2. David Wilson, Dave Souza, you say that the claim that ''Darwin only made one allusion to human origins in OTOOS'' is supported by the passage you both quoted. In fact however, you need to choose one of ''multiple possible interpretations'' to get there. As mentioned above, the claim that Darwin was “completely silent on the subject of human origins” is qualified, but what is the qualifier? Is it the phrase “in ''several places'' he did refer to mankind [emphasis added]” or “The only words he allowed himself…”. Clearly if the former applies, then it shoots your theory out of the sky. Thus you have to show that the claim about Darwin being “completely silent” on human origins ''is not being qualified with several references to mankind'', but even if you do, this clearly is an exceptional claim which would require more sourcing to meet Wikipedia’s high standards.3. Further proof that sexual selection in humans alludes to human evolution which in turn alludes to human origins is  which "distances mention of sexual selection from 'his theory'". Why? It seems we don't want people to think that monkeys are our ancestors, do we? Some things don't change, even after 156 years.4. The truth is, it is a judgment call to come up with specific numbers on how many times Darwin (a) alluded to, (b) mentioned, and (c) discussed (i) human evolution and (ii) human origins in ''OTOOS.'' Different people have different understandings of the threshold required to meet each category and even then, it is probably context specific. Academics are free to express their opinions on the matter and Wikipedia can report this, but the policy is clear that these opinions need to be attributed and "''cannot be asserted in Wikipedia as if it were a fact''" (WP:ATTRIBUTEPOV). Furthermore, it is inappropriate for editors to synthesize numbers for a particular category that academics themselves don't clearly identify (WP:SYNTH). . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 23:00, 18 January 2016 (UTC):I'm not proving your point. Allude ≠ discuss. The judgement call isn't up to us, but to secondary and tertiary sources, which agree Darwin was silent (or "silent"). This latest entire post of yours, along with Point 3, posted on 06:28, 18 January 2016, is the kind of primary source analysis not allowed at Wikipedia, although it's required in academia.:From WP:ANALYSIS:'''''Policy''''': Wikipedia articles usually rely on material from reliable secondary sources. Articles may make an analytic, evaluative, interpretive, or synthetic claim only if that has been published by a reliable secondary source.:YoPienso (talk) 23:57, 18 January 2016 (UTC)::Ummm, actually, you are proving my point. I ''am'' saying that judgement calls are not up to us, at least in terms of adding or restoring claims to an article. (“There is reasonable allowance for speculation, suggestion, and personal knowledge on talk pages, with a view to prompting further investigation,” WP:TALK) You claim that my recent posts are analyzing a primary source, and this is where you are completely mistaken. The analysis here is about Janet Browne’s claim that “In this book, he was completely silent on the subject of human origins”. As we all agree, “completely silent” is not meant literally; it has to be interpreted to be properly understood. And it is precisely this interpretation that Wikipedia prohibits in citations. The burden to demonstrate verifiability “is satisfied by providing a citation to a reliable source that ''directly supports the contribution''” (emphasis added, WP:PROVEIT). ''To repeat,'' the problem here is not whether the source is primary or secondary. The problem arises because the disputed claim is not directly supported by, but instead requires interpretation of, the source. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 02:03, 19 January 2016 (UTC):::Janet Browne clearly states on p. 60, ''He avoided talking about the origin of human beings and he avoided God. [...] In this book, he was completely silent of the subject of human origins, although he did refer in several places to mankind as an example of biological details.'':::That's very straightforward; there's nothing to interpret. You just disagree and are being argumentative. I won't be wasting more time discussing the matter with you. YoPienso (talk) 02:35, 19 January 2016 (UTC):::Stan, are you having trouble parsing "he was silent... except"? As for the sentence mentioning sexual selection, in ''Descent'' CD explicitly relates that to "many details of structure in man could not be explained through natural selection", not to human origins. .As Yopienso indicates, you're flogging a dead horse in an increasingly tendentious manner. .  . dave souza, talk 02:47, 19 January 2016 (UTC)::::::(added later) I just realized today that if you “parse” the particular passage that YoPienso identified here as “very straightforward” with the template that Dave provided, you get that ''Darwin was silent on the subject of human origins, '''except for several places.''''' This is only putting 2 and 2 together. Yet the claim it was supposed to support is that there was '''only one exception.'''  I seriously hope there is no confusion left as to why John van Wyhe is needed as a source. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 03:15, 21 January 2016 (UTC)::::1. YoPienso, I accept that you were posting in good faith, and I’m sorry you feel as you do. But, as you say, I do disagree with you on this particular point, and I very much believe this argument / conversation is needed. This is exactly why Wikipedia has talk pages: to make sure the content in the article is properly verified (WP:V).::::2. Dave, yes, of course I have trouble with, “he was silent … except”. Why? Because “except” means fill in the blank with your own interpretation. In  OTOOS was silent except for the one “''allusion'' to human origins”. In  OTOOS was silent except for his one “''discussion'' of human origins”. In  OTOOS was silent except for the one “''mention'' of human origins”. As YoPienso said earlier, “Allude ≠ discuss” yet this edit history interprets “except” as Allude = Discuss = Mention. This is exactly why Wikipedia insists so strongly that a source "directly supports the contribution" (WP:PROVEIT).::::3. I’ll repeat it again, Browne’s claims that “He avoided talking about the origin of human beings” and “In this book, he was completely silent of the subject of human origins” cannot be taken literally, as Darwin did talk just a little bit about the origins of human beings in OTOOS. Thus, these claims unfortunately ''shall not'' be used as sources in Wikipedia articles (whether or not they are used in violation is another matter altogether). I’m sorry that this makes people upset, but I can’t apologize for believing what I do, nor for standing up for what I believe. Now I need to go to bed and to work tomorrow. Sigh.  —Preceding unsigned comment added by Stan Giesbrecht (talk • Special:Contributions/Stan Giesbrecht|contribs) 06:11, 19 January 2016 (UTC);;; ;;:::::Stan, you seem to be on your own in your reading of these sources. Perhaps you would do better taking literally ; "Although Darwin refrained from discussing the derivation of any particular species, including man, in the ''Origin'' except for his famous sentence: 'Much light will be thrown on the origin of man and his history' many people who read the book could think only about what this genealogical view of life meant for human beings." John van Wyhe is another eminent historian who publishes on Darwin. . . dave souza, talk 10:39, 19 January 2016 (UTC)::::::1. Yes, thank you, Dave. I very much appreciate a source where the claims are literal and can be taken at face value. So much better than: "Darwin never did X. Ever. Although there were several exceptions. Except maybe there was only ever one exception. If this doesn’t make sense to you, go ask someone for an 'explanation' ".::::::2. I know why you accuse those who demand compliance with WP:VERIFIABILITY with being tendentious.  where you claim that “Darwin did not share the then common view that other races are inferior”. You cited Darwin’s autobiography, showing he had a black tutor. This, to you, was proof of your claim. And all of the times you have accused me of original research! Hitler had a Japanese friend, so clearly he wasn’t racist. How’s that for original research?::::::3.  where you claimed “His only allusion to human evolution was the understatement …”. In ''OTOOS,'' Darwin stated that sexual selection applied to humans, so you were claiming that ''sexual selection is somehow not an allusion to evolution''. Words fail me at a time like this. () It needed changing, yet when I did, there was a fierce backlash.::::::4.  Jimiraywinter explaining who is really being WP:TENDENTIOUS here. It is sad that you are so determined to maintain a certain image of Darwin that you want to distort reality, but what’s even worse is that other editors are letting you get away with it here on Wikipedia.::::::5. With all that said, we made some significant improvements to the article, so that’s something to smile about, isn't it? . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 01:53, 20 January 2016 (UTC)''OTOOS'': “the hand of a man … [is explained by] the theory of descent with … modifications”1. Several weeks ago, we got into a lively discussion about the claim that ''Darwin had only alluded to human origins one time in OTOOS,'' namely his statement that “light will be thrown on the origin of man”.  There was significant resistance when I wanted to remove it.  Even though I was not super familiar with ''OTOOS'', I knew it didn’t pass the sniff test, and it was eventually removed when it was shown that it was not actually supported by the alleged source.2. Since then I have become a bit more familiar with ''OTOOS'' and realized that there is another passage where Darwin very definitely alludes to human origins.  He compared the human hand to appendages in other mammals on several occasions, including in particular, when he wrote, “'''The framework of bones''' being the same '''in the hand of a man''', wing of a bat, fin of the porpoise, and leg of the horse … at once '''explain themselves on the theory of descent with''' slow and slight successive '''modifications'''” (emphasis added, ''Origin'', 1859, page 479).  There are links in the Charles Darwin article from both “human descent” and “human evolution” to the “Human evolution” article.  It seems pretty obvious that the passage on descent with modification explaining human biological features is an allusion to human origins.  Wikipedia has policies to prevent exactly these kinds of disputes.  So what went wrong?3. Wikipedia policy does not require that something be proven true to be added, but it must be verified by a reliable source.  However, it must be remembered that ''when a claim is proven to be false, it is obviously not verified by a reliable source''.  There are 2 components here that I want to focus on: (1) The claim must be verified, that is, the source must make the claim in reality and not just in someone’s imagination, and (2) the source must be reliable.  It turns out that both components failed in.Claim must be verified4. In this dispute, I was attempting to remove a claim that others wanted restored.  In content removal situations, Wikipedia policy is clear that the onus rests on the party seeking to restore content must prove that it is verified (WP:PROVEIT).  Yet at , I was told that I had to show that the reference of sexual selection applying to humans was ''clearly and unequivocally'' an allusion to human origins, when in fact, the onus should have been assumed by the other side to show not just that this reference was not such an allusion, but also that there were no other such allusions elsewhere in the book (which of course there was).  So, the misplaced burden of proof was problematic.5. A bigger problem is that the claim did not follow the source.  In fact, it seemed to .Another example of a claim not following the source is that Darwin didn’t perceive racial inferiority.In defending this claim, Dave Souza said it was just so “complex”  and .In the latter post, he went so far as to say that he “[didn’t] find it straightforward”.Yet this confusion didn’t stop him from trying to synthesize support for the claim in .The truth is, if it really is so f*#$ing complex, Jimmy WalesIndeed, in , “complex” was used to signal disapproval of content that meets all the criteria for Wikipedia.So, what I’m trying to say in this paragraph: '''make sure that the source ''actually says what the editor claims''''' and call them out when claims smells fishy.Source must be reliable6. But I think the biggest problem here is that Janet Browne is actually not a reliable source at all.  A few weeks ago, I thought the presence of inaccuracies was just her idiosyncratic writing style, where things needed to be interpreted and taken with a healthy grain of salt.  But having read more in ''OTOOS'', having battled with the Guardian over the lies of Adam Rutherford, and having thought about this more, I have come to realize that Anarchangel is correct that it doesn’t matter  that admire her beautiful prose.  What matters is whether the claims in that beautiful prose hold water. They don’t:7. Browne writes: “With profound deliberation … He avoided talking about the origin of human beings. … he had long ago drained his manuscripts of any reference to … human ancestry. He had no intention of reintroducing them now. In this book, he was completely silent on the subject of human origins”.  This is so emphatic and so utterly false.  It’s classic propaganda: write a few lies, then say something that contradicts it (the truth), and pretend it fits together. The true believers have something to point to and they can say, “see, here! Browne did mention that Darwin talked about the origins of man”.  Okay great, so why is she also so emphatic that he hadn’t?!!8. Browne writes: “With profound deliberation … he avoided God. … he had long ago drained his manuscripts of any reference to a Creator … He had no intention of reintroducing them now.”  Also completely false.  Darwin mentions “the Creator” 7 times in the 1st edition and adds 2 more references, using it 9 times in the 2nd.  Again, later in the paragraph, she acknowledges that Darwin “spoke cautiously of the Creator” which completely contradicts her earlier claim where she says he had not reintroduced the Creator.  And again, the perfect propaganda piece, because you can use it to support whatever claim you want to make.9. Browne writes: “He purposefully avoided the first origin of life, … Darwin’s text refused to propose any theory of absolute origins.”  This also isn’t true.  Darwin wrote that “'''the first creature''', the progenitor of innumerable extinct and living descendants, '''was created'''” (emphasis added, Ed 1, 1859, page 488).  In the last sentence of the 1st edition he wrote that life was originally “breathed into” the first forms of life, and in the next 5 editions he went further, writing that the first powers of life had “been originally '''breathed by the Creator''' into a few forms or into one” (emphasis added, Ed 2, 1860, page 490).  It’s time to call a spade a spade.  That’s definitely not “purposefully avoiding the first origin of life”.10. That’s simply too much WP:BULLSHIT.  I’ve seen this logic on Answers In Genesis so many times: say a pack of lies in weird and clever ways, then say the truth or something that is almost the truth, mix in a lot of smokescreens and a few red herrings.  The perfect way to see who is really drinking the WP:KOOLAID and who is only pretending to.  The bottom line here is that '''Janet Browne is ''not a reliable source'' about Charles Darwin'''. While most of what she writes is probably accurate and true, those relying on it must follow the evidence to the primary sources to verify any given claim.11. Finally, I want to draw an analogy with what Browne wrote about Darwin: “No matter how seriously and cautiously he might treat evolutionary questions himself, he knew that anything he said was bound to ignite furious controversy”.  In a similar fashion today, reporting what Darwin actually wrote about humans and human races, no matter how seriously and cautiously, ''is bound to ignite furious controversy''. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 23:24, 10 February 2016 (UTC):@ Stan Giesbrecht, your biggest problem is that you're relying on your original research to dismiss what multiple eminent historians have published about Darwin. No "original research" is a core policy, and you should be trying to follow what historians have published rather than dismissing them on the basis of your own unusual interpretations. We can work on improving our understanding and coverage, but should not give undue weight to unpublished assessments of Darwin's views. Since your use of primary sources is clearly disputed, WP:PSTS applies. For these reasons, I've undone your edit. Focus on finding a published secondary source that supports your analysis, and don't attack other editors.  I'm not going to respond in detail to all the sprawling points you've raised, for discussion purposes it works much better if you can raise one point at a time and sign it to allow direct discussion, and try to keep on-topic rather than attacking the reputation of good quality sources. . dave souza, talk 09:04, 11 February 2016 (UTC):In addition, the "Letter to Guardian" posted above is indicative of someone on a mission. However, righting great wrongs is not the purpose of Wikipedia. Given the commitment involved, it is unlikely that further discussion would be productive. Johnuniq (talk) 10:12, 11 February 2016 (UTC)::1. ''Johnuniq,'' you’re absolutely right that I am on a mission to get the Guardian to correct the brazen lies that they published about Charles Darwin, such as claiming that he never talked about humans at all in ''OTOOS''.  I will continue to push them to correct these inaccuracies as their own editorial code requires and I would also encourage others to pressure the Guardian to be honest and accurate.  But as I’ve already mentioned, that is not why I posted [those letters] on this talk page. I was responding to a proposal to add a claim to the article that Darwin wasn’t racist, and to use Adam Rutherford's article as a source for this claim.  As you know, Wikipedia’s verification policy requires claims to be supported by a ''reliable'' source, and I wanted to show that Rutherford is certainly not reliable and shall not be used as a reference to verify such a claim on Wikipedia articles.::2. Also, thank you from pointing out that Wikipedia's purpose is not to right great wrongs.  This is in contrast to the Guardian, which seems working hard at righting great wrongs.  In particular, they seem to think that they can end racism by pretending that race doesn’t exist.  To support this ridiculous fantasy, they published a number of lies about Charles Darwin, one of my heroes.  In the past, there have been a number of similar misrepresentations on the Darwin article here and also many more on the ''Descent of Man'' Wikipedia article.  Some of these were clearly a misguided attempt to right great wrongs, as was pointed out, so that was a good call: we need to take extra caution to ensure that Wikipedia articles don’t use false or misleading information in some committed effort to right great wrongs, but rather that we accurately present Darwin, warts and all.::3. ''Dave,'' you are correct that No Original Research is a core policy of Wikipedia, but are falsely accusing me of such for 2 reasons: (1) The policy prohibits ''original research being added or restored '''to an encyclopedia article'''''.  The policy ''does not prohibit it in a discussion '''on the talk page'''''.  And (2) reporting on something published '''''is not original''''' ''because it has already been published''.::4. From Wikipedia:Editorial discretion:::'''Editorial Discretion is not Original Research''':::'''It is ''not original research'' to make judgement calls on what content to include or not include,''' how to frame an issue or claim, or what claims and subjects are suitable for Wikipedia. We are not here to robotically compile facts and citations according to a strict set of rules, '''we are here to ''create and edit an encyclopedia.''''' This task requires the application of judgement and discretion in order to create a neutral and readable encyclopedia.:::'''The policy on original research is ''sometimes misconstrued as a blanket prohibition'' on any application of judgement or critical thinking by editors.''' The intent of that policy was never to turn editing into an unthinking task, and our articles into mere compilations of published data.(emphasis added);/blockquote;::5. From WP:PSTS which you cited:::::6. You called my “interpretations” unusual.  They certainly are not common inside the heavily protected Walled Garden of liberal delusions.  But do you know who else pushed his “unusual interpretation” relentlessly in the face of the ''furious controversy it ignited''? That’s right, Darwin himself.  And we are better for his efforts.::7. A better candidate for “unusual interpretation” is taking Browne's claim that::::to mean that Darwin actually ''wasn't'' completely silent about human origins in ''OTOOS''.  That is truly unusual.::8. The truth is however, I am not really interpreting anything.  I’m simply reporting what Darwin actually wrote and pointing out that there are some wild inconsistencies with what Browne wrote in ''Power of Place'',  You can call it research if you want, but there is ''nothing original'' with reporting that Darwin wrote::::::::::9. What are the odds I could copyright these quotes?  Absolutely zero!  Why? Because they are ''not original''.  Research maybe, but certainly not original.  And it is nothing more than common sense to recognize that these quotes are wildly inconsistent with Janet Browne’s claims that Darwin never introduced a Creator and that he completely “avoided the first origins of life” in ''OTOOS''. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 07:29, 12 February 2016 (UTC)edits1. I edited the following 2 claims, because they are not verified, that is, there is not a source that says the same thing:* “He avoided discussing human origins beyond one sentence…”* “Darwin avoided mention of human origins save for…”The source that this is referenced to is John van Whye’s: “Darwin refrained from discussing the derivation” of humans, except for the one time.  But derivation ≠ origin.  Derivation is the ''act of obtaining'' something from its origin.  So, that's why I removed the word "avoid" in re-framing the sentences.2. I added the claim that Darwin compared human anatomy to that of other mammals, as this is important information about Darwin's most famous book.  It is cited to ''OTOOS'' which is obviously a reliable source, even if it is primary.  I also pointed out that ''OTOOS'' implied common ancestry for humans, which is what Darwin wrote in ''TDOM'' which is not only a reliable source but also a secondary one as it is analyzing and describing another book.  Darwin's discussions of humans in ''OTOOS'' while brief, were nevertheless very significant, and were being downplayed, which does not represent a neutral point of view. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 07:50, 12 February 2016 (UTC)Replies:Still no secondary or third party source, as required by WP:SOURCES policy, and "nevertheless very significant" is only your own original research: your synthesis is against policy. Worse still, you've been removing good quality secondary sources by historians you disagree with: NPOV#WP:WEIGHT requires due weight to that scholarship. If the point was "nevertheless very significant" you'd be able to find it being discussed by historians: I've looked, and not found any indication that the passage about Owen's homology should be taken with the interpretation you're putting on it. Multiple sources highlight the avoidance of discussion of human origins beyond "Light will be thrown on the origin of man and his history", we can discuss exact phrasing of this point but you're becoming tendentious in trying to overturn published historical analysis. . dave souza, talk 09:05, 12 February 2016 (UTC):I will point out that your efforts are better aimed at publishing a peer reviewed paper, that is a placed for original research.  BTW please keep things shorter here as it is difficult to follow, perhaps write up your what you want to include in your sandbox and summarize here why you think it should go in this article.  BTW I added a subsection heading so people can find the end of your argument.  You should almost certainly not include subsection headings within your own argument on Talk pages.  Erp (talk) 15:00, 12 February 2016 (UTC)::1. Erp, I take your point about not using subsection headings on the talk page.  I didn’t realize how it would affect the edit summaries.  Live and learn (I hope).::2. The point I was trying to make, and seemly not getting across, is that '''I am not doing original research'''.  Mr. Souza’s claims of such are simply not true.  His accusations are false, yet he is very gifted at spinning the truth, and so it seems plausible to many people.  In fact, it is Charles Darwin who did the original research here. I have spent much time reading ''TDOM'' and some time reading ''OTOOS'' which can be labeled as “research”.  But, I am only summarizing and reporting that material, just like Wikipedia editors are supposed to.  So, to repeat, ''I cannot be original in this regard, '''because the originality is Darwin’s'''''.::3. Johnuniq is critical of my “campaign” but in fact, Dave Souza has been far more committed than I have. I have only been editing Wikipedia since the Christmas break, while ''Mr. Souza’s extreme commitment'' to controlling the narrative of Darwin’s views on the human species and on human races ''has been going on for many years.''  In fact, nearly every post on race here for the last decade was by Mr. Souza.  These posts covered the whole spectrum of truthfulness, ranging from truthful and informative to technically honest but deliberately misleading to significant distortions to complete and utter lies. Fact and fiction got blended together '''to make Charles Darwin compatible with contemporary liberal values on race.'''::4. Various editors have said that I was going against the “consensus”.  But WP:Consensus actually requires multiple editors to bring different perspectives that get resolved through compromise, not one editor writing the narrative that is protected by a posse.::5. Mr. Souza is, in his own way, a very gifted writer, capable of spinning a story, and highly motivated in his WP:Disruptive Editing.  He will often take posts by other editors and re-write them to spin the narrative differently, in an effort to establish Ownership of Content.  He rewords passages back and forth and around and around and buries contentious claims in sprawling edits with unhelpful and misleading edit summaries.  References get added and dropped and moved around, making it impossible for a fact checker to know which particular source is said to be supporting any given claim.  This is completely against the spirit of Wikipedia's community editing policy.::6. Mr. Souza's last 5 edits are a fantastic example.  He moved material back and forth and reworded a number of passages with no description on the talk page and completely unhelpful edit summaries.  He also added the 2 following claims:::* "Darwin's belief that other races were 'equal humans'"…::* "Darwin's belief that black people were fully equal"…::7. So, he is claiming that Darwin believed that all races were “equal”, in a tangential way, which is problematic.  An encyclopedia should state important facts directly and should not mix them in with other claims in such a way as could be confusing, although that’s clearly what Mr. Souza wants.  By imbedding the claims into the fabric of the story, it is harder for others to edit them later; so this is against Wikipedia policy.  Another problem with these recent edits is that we have no way of knowing which source is supposed to be saying these things.  I have already described how he makes claims about Darwin's views on race that are entirely his own, then defends his synthesis by alluding to various sources, claiming that it is "complex" and that he "[doesn't] find it straightforward" (para. 5, [Claims must be verified]).  To an unbiased person this would indicate that the claims should be removed from the article instead of maintained.::8. But the biggest problem here is that these claims are utter WP:BULLSHIT.  Darwin was absolutely clear that he didn’t view all races as equal.  He described animals as being higher and lower on the “organic scale” and he also applied this scale to human races.  Most of the time Darwin didn’t specify which particular race was where on this scale, but in a fascinating and well know passage in ''TDOM'', he explicitly stated that “the negro [and] the Australian” were closer to the ape than "the Caucasian" was.(''Descent'', Ed 2, 1874, page 156) Yopeninso has also  numerous secondary and tertiary sources stating that Darwin didn’t view all races as equal,  Desmond and Moore, in ''Darwin: The Life of a Tormented Evolutionist,'' p. ''xxi,'' "He thought blacks inferior but was sickened by slavery."::9. I can't say whether or not these claims are written in some published source somewhere, but it is worth noting that Mr. Souza referenced Desmond and Moore here, who actually said ''exactly the opposite'' of what Mr. Souza did.  What I can say with total certainty is that these claims here are ''not verified by a '''reliable''' source'' (WP:V).::10. Mr. Souza has accused me of many things, most of which are false, and I have repeatedly pointed this out. Yet he never responds to the points I raise, just whines that I lack civility and need to assume good faith, and then levels another false accusation against me.  Oh, the irony!  I’m going to need your help, here, folks. Jimiraywinter  years ago.  Dave Souza is a master story teller, but he is a liar and not here to build an encyclopedia (WP:NOTHERE). . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 17:32, 13 February 2016 (UTC)::::I undid the last 5 edits to the version of 08:15, 12 February 2016‎ (which is also the version of 08:33, 1 February 2016). I meant to put that in the edit summary (and now can't). Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 17:49, 13 February 2016 (UTC):::I suggest you remove the bit where you call another editor a liar.    Please read WP:NPA.  You might also look at WP:CONSENSUS.   If you think there has been some sort of misconduct please bring it to WP:ANI rather than here.  Thank you.  Dbrodbeck (talk) 17:42, 13 February 2016 (UTC):::*@Stan Giesbrecht your personal attacks are getting old fast.  You need to step back from your personal attacks and disruption on this page.  I know you have read some of Darwin and you believe you fully understand Darwin and his historical context, but I assure you that you do not. --I am One of Many (talk) 21:35, 13 February 2016 (UTC):::Stan, if you were using Darwin's books as sources for biology articles then that would be appropriate use of them for a wikipedia editor (though woefully out-of-date).  However interpreting them to draw conclusions about the author is original research and the domain of a biographer or a historian; someone who has spent time studying all or most of Darwin's works and correspondence and is familiar with the milieu (among other things the different meanings 'race' had at that time).  You are best off sticking to works done by biographers and historians and, given the vast amount written about Darwin, relatively recent ones.  Which means sticking to stuff like Desmond and Moore, in ''Darwin: The Life of a Tormented Evolutionist,'' p. ''xxi,'' "He thought blacks inferior but was sickened by slavery.";/blockquote; though I would be concerned that the quote seems to come from the preface and not the body.  My own view is that Darwin was somewhat racist though not very by the standards of his time; he certainly saw men and women of all races as fully human.   Looking over the article I'm a bit concerned that the quote "equal humans" does not have a citation and does not have proper context.  Erp (talk) 03:01, 14 February 2016 (UTC)::::1. Erp, the quote you provided from Desmond and Moore states explicitly that Darwin thought blacks were inferior, yet the disputed claims say that Darwin thought blacks were fully equal. You question the reliability of Desmond and Moore here, simply because it’s in the preface.  This strikes me as odd; I think if they published it, we should presume they knew what they were saying when they wrote it.  But even if the quoted passage is unreliable as you suggest, YoPienso has provided numerous other references that  (near the bottom of the section [Differences between races]).::::2. I Am One of Many, I am completely baffled as to why you are supporting unsourced and false claims on Wikipedia.  You claim that I don't know as much about Darwin as I think I do.  That might be true, but it is not the issue here.  As I mentioned in the paragraph above, there is an abundance of secondary and tertiary sources that disagree entirely with the disputed claims.  That is the problem that needs to be addressed.  Wikipedia is not a democracy where an editor can be voted off the island just for kicking the sacred cow (see WP:NOTCENSORED).  Wikipedia policy makes absolutely clear that all legitimate concerns need to be addressed in reaching a WP:Consensus.  Making sure claims are verified by a reliable source is definitely a legitimate concern (WP:V).::::3. It is you who are supporting a campaign of WP:Disruptive editing in your latest reversion. The only thing I am "disrupting" is the ownership of the article (WP:OWN).  From the subsection, Multiple-editor ownership:::::::::I could not have said it better! . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 16:46, 14 February 2016 (UTC):::::Stan, see the next sentence: "As before, address the topic and not the actions of the editors." Do that. . dave souza, talk 20:51, 14 February 2016 (UTC):::::Indeed, this is not the place to complain about conduct.  There is a place Stan, it is called WP:ANI.  If you really think there has been misconduct here you ought to bring it up there.  Dbrodbeck (talk) 20:59, 14 February 2016 (UTC)::::::1. Dave, you missed a sentence.  (Check the link.)  What the next sentence really says is, "This is often informally described as a tag team, and can be frustrating to both new and seasoned editors."  This is absolutely spot on.  The tag teaming here is very frustrating indeed!::::::2. Dbrodbeck, the ownership of this article for the past decade has seriously compromised the accuracy here in presenting a sanitized, politically correct version of Darwin, that simply doesn't map onto reality.  An important role of talk pages is to discuss ways to improve the accuracy of Wikipedia.  That is why this conversation is so important here, even if it is painful for all.  Regardless of how many guts are churning, it is incumbent on all of us editors to strive to present a more accurate portrait of Darwin, even if there are some warts in that picture. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 03:31, 17 February 2016 (UTC):I'm querying its location in the frontmatter (Roman numerals) simply because that is not where authors make their arguments and may not be as careful in supporting what they say there (frontmatter material is usually not peer reviewed).    I do think the article should be careful to separate whether Darwin saw all people as 'equally human' (entitled to life, liberty, pursuit of happiness, which I think he did) from whether he saw all humans as equal in abilities (he did not) from whether he saw different groups of humans (e.g., 'races' or social classes or sexes) as inherently equal in ability or equal in result (certainly not equal in result).  His views almost certainly varied over time and also between gut feeling and intellectual conclusion (e.g., all humans are equal until my daughter wants to marry the coachman [not that his daughter did want to marry a coachman but such an incident does show up in the family letters as happening to an acquaintance]).  So is this article clear in its distinctions and does it support each?  Does it also reflect any major disagreement, if any, in the academic community?  For instance from an academic critique of Sacred Cause?  Erp (talk) 04:41, 17 February 2016 (UTC)::Erp, in footnote VI, the article claims that Darwin believed “that black people were fully equal”.  I think this is simply untrue, or at the very least, very misleading.  What do you think? . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 01:38, 18 February 2016 (UTC):::I would prefer it to be worded so it was clearer what type of equality is being referred to.  It is certainly based on the quote I mentioned in the section below on 'equal humans'.    Are we talking entitled to equal human dignity which I think is what Desmond and Morris think Darwin believed (and I think correctly) or something else?  Depending on what the source states I would think something like "Darwin's belief that black people were entitled to equal human dignity was ...". Erp (talk) 04:24, 18 February 2016 (UTC)::::1. Desmond and Moore write that Darwin was obeying the command “to honour black people as 'equal humans'”.  So, they actually don’t say anything directly about what Darwin ''believed,'' just what command he was obeying.  They certainly don’t say anything about equality in dignity, just equality of freedom from slavery.  So, the sentence now is false and needs to be removed or changed, but your proposal to change it is not actually verified by the source.::::2. Furthermore, I’m not convinced that Darwin ever wrote that he thought that blacks were entitled to equal dignity (it seems at odds with what he wrote in ''TDOM'' and other places).  Certainly he detested slavery and cruelty towards black people, but these are different things and people today should not be putting words into Darwin’s mouth. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 12:54, 18 February 2016 (UTC):::::As Cagliost stated in the edit summary, the claim that Darwin believed other races to be equal is simply not true.  I have removed the 2 such claims from the article.  The one in the footnote was simple to remove, but the one in subsection "Human Society" was (deliberately) embedded into the passage, meaning that the surrounding sentences would need to be substantially reworked to remove the false claim.  Therefore, I simply reverted the whole edit and restored the previously existing version of subsection "Human Society".  (That particular edit was a lot of moving text back and forth and seriously lacked an WP:IMPARTIAL tone anyway.) . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 02:46, 19 February 2016 (UTC)::::::As far as I can see, your views on Darwin are WP:FRINGE, so please discuss them and obtain consensus in the future. --I am One of Many (talk) 03:24, 19 February 2016 (UTC):::::::Both Erp and Cagliost already agreed that the disputed claims are not true.  You didn’t even bother reading what was written.  All I did was revert the previous version of that particular subsection, which I properly explained.  I had nothing at all to do with the “fringe view from 'European Journal of Women's Studies'” that you accuse me of.  If you would have looked, you would have realized that the version that you restored already has the “fringe view” that you accuse me of.  That line was added long before our present dispute.  If that journal really is against policy as you claim, then go ahead and delete it or start a discussion, but whatever you do, please read before you act. . Stan Giesbrecht (talk) 04:13, 19 February 2016 (UTC): I'm moving my replies down to the 'equal humans' section below so it is easier to find Erp (talk) 06:15, 19 February 2016 (UTC)Firestorm of debateI've removed the quote saying that "Light will be thrown on the origin of man" had "created a firestorm of debate by implying that humans evolved from animals." It's cited to [Introduction] to "Evolution of Evolution: Anthropology," National Science Foundation, n.d. Retrieved 17 Jan. 2016. Click to essay by Tim White that largely validates Darwin's predictions in ''“The Descent of Man'' that human ancestors would be found in Africa." However, the quote is in the intro, author unknown, and rather goes against the point made earlier [cited to van Wyhe] that there was less controversy than had greeted the popular ''Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation''. White's essay looks like a useful source, possibly for the ''Descent'' article.   Browne makes the point on p. 90 that the expected storm of controversy did not crack open immediately. On p. 87, discussing the Leifchild ''Athenaeum'' review, she writes that "That first review rankled", and earlier notes that it was published four days before ''OtOOS'' was published, so I've restored the mention that this was the first review. . dave souza, talk 18:13, 18 January 2016 (UTC):Wrt to "firestorm," there was a reason Huxley was called "Darwin's bulldog." He gleefully anticipated combating "the curs which will bark and yelp. [...] I am sharpening up my claws and beak ." That the immediate controversy was less than the one over ''Vestiges'' doesn't mean it was small. But I'm fine with your edit.:Yes, I missed that Leifchild's review was apparently the first published review. YoPienso (talk) 19:01, 18 January 2016 (UTC)::Thanks, after the slow initial start there was widespread debate about human evolution, but as , "recent research suggests that the reaction to Darwin's ''Origin'' was less of a furore than once believed", and in relation to the discussion above, "Although Darwin refrained from discussing the derivation of any particular species, including man, in the ''Origin'' except for his famous sentence: 'Much light will be thrown on the origin of man and his history' many people who read the book could think only about what this genealogical view of life meant for human beings." Maybe worth adding a cite to that. . dave souza, talk 03:07, 19 January 2016 (UTC)Family TreeALL of the grandchildren have now been accounted for, but the spouses of three grandchildren: Charles, Gwendoline, and Ruth are currently 'missing': of the second generation of the Darwin family (grandchildren of Charles and Emma) the following three graves have NOT yet been located:  Lady Katharine Darwin, nee Pember, wife of Sir Charles Galton Darwin; Jacques Pierre Paul Raverat (husband of Gwen Raverat, nee Darwin) and also  William Rees-Thomas (husband of Ruth Rees – Thomas, nee Darwin). (Unfortunately the grave of Erasmus Darwin (1881-1915), son of Sir Horace and Lady 'Ida' Darwin, was destroyed during WWI.) Of these three, Jacques Raverat is more than likely to be the most difficult to find in France, the other two are somewhere in England! Any help in finding these three is to be much appreciated?'Darwinian Gravedigger'Special:Contributions/2.30.187.198|2.30.187.198 (talk)  —Preceding undated comment added 14:12, 20 January 2016 (UTC);; ;;"equal humans'The "equal humans" seems to be a quote of a quote on page 26 of Sacred Cause according to google books, unfortunately I don't have a physical copy to check the original citation to see whether Darwin wrote it or it was written by some else in his social network.  The fuller quote on page 26 is "Coming from a family which had campaigned to emancipate Britain's colonial slaves and obeying the abolitionist command to honour black people as 'equal humans', young Darwin had been happy to be taught by a 'full-blooded negro'."   I will note that though considering them equal in humanity does not mean that someone might not consider a group as unequal in other aspects (many of the white abolitionists did consider that blacks were inferior [note also that many also considered women as equally human but inferior]).   Erp (talk) 15:59, 14 February 2016 (UTC):Thanks, it's a good catch that I've quoted the abolitionist command without attributing it clearly: have revised the wording to address this issue. The wording can be reviewed in further context – Browne (1995) pp. 196–197 covers Darwin sharing his family's opposition to slavery, and p. 198 says "In his view, slaves were men and women with the same feelings as anyone. Personal experience told him so. His memories of kindly John Edmonston in Edinburgh were at the front of his mind; the freed slave... ". On p. 240 she makes the point that "with the comfortable liberalism of English Whigs, he found the polite manners and easy disposition of Jemmy Button and Fuegia Basket completely unremarkable. .... The three Fuegians appeared to him like solid country peasants, deferential and mostly easy to deal with. More than this, however, he was ready to believe them as intelligent as the next person, a point he made himself in remembering the interesting talks he once had with John Edmonston"... She then quotes the first para in  of ''Descent'', 1871, so these views continued. At that time, he also endorsed ideas of progressive evolution, and had to puzzle how uneducated aborigines had become civilised Whig Europeans. His views were complex and shifting, so will aim to find the best source for a brief statement on that. . . dave souza, talk 21:28, 14 February 2016 (UTC)We've seem to be having this discussion in two places and it seems to include both Darwin's attitudes towards women and his attitudes towards other 'races'.  I'm moving the discussion down here to be easier to find (I've also started a new section on the Blackwell mention that people are also arguing over).  I think we have to be careful to place Darwin within his context.   For a Victorian upper-middle class man he was quite progressive, that does not make him progressive by 21st century standards.   I think it necessary to include ideas from Browne, Desmond and Moore, and the other respected Charles Darwin scholars.  Erp (talk) 06:15, 19 February 2016 (UTC):On the "equal humans" nuances, from the same pages of ''Sacred Cause'' I've  as "Darwin's belief that black people had the same essential humanity as Europeans, and had many mental similarities", tending to understate the source. . dave souza, talk 17:56, 19 February 2016 (UTC):With reference to the above pages from Browne, i've  to include the point that "Darwin was passionately opposed to slavery, while seeing no problem with the working conditions of English factory workers or servants." Similarly, I've avoided the "equal humans" formulation and from her description reworded it as "his belief that black people shared the same feelings, and could be as intelligent as other races". Work in progress, as there's an interesting point to be made about his 1871 adoption from others of progressive evolution on a scale from savage to civilised, will try to find time to work that in. . dave souza, talk 17:56, 19 February 2016 (UTC)Antoinette Brown Blackwell and the EJWS articleSomeone changed a part of the article on the grounds of fringe.  I will note that the European Journal of Women's Studies is a peer reviewed journal home based in the London School of Economics (i.e., it isn't obviously fringe).  However Antoinette Brown Blackwell is a contemporary of Darwin's and that isn't clear from  the mention in this Wikipedia article or that her particular criticisms weren't widely accepted then. The journal article author doesn't agree with  Blackwell's conclusions but agrees with her (and Darwin) that sexual selection is important (I haven't closely read the article yet and there is the whole question of evolutionary psychology).  The article does discuss Darwin's views and notes that the idea of 'female choice' was revolutionary at the time.Although Darwin’s view of females was quite narrow, the agency that he conferred to them, however slight it may have been when compared to current theorizing on sexual selection, was in fact revolutionary at thetime. His evolutionist contemporaries could not accept it, since females were assumed to be passive in the mating process (Buss, 1994; Cronin, 1994; Gowaty, 1992). Reaction against the theory went so far that after Darwin’s death it was almost completely forgotten. ... Although Darwin attributed a far more important evolutionary role to females than evolutionary biologists would do for almost a century after him, he clearly did not succeed in separating his scientific attitude from his social prejudices. ... There is a contradiction at the heart of Darwin’s view of females: they exert a sexual choice and are passive at the same time. He seemed caught between the Victorian wisdom about women and his own observations.(Vandermassen, Griet (2004). "Sexual Selection: A Tale of Male Bias and Feminist Denial". European Journal of Women's Studies 11 (9): 11–13. doi:10.1177/1350506804039812);/blockquote;  The article then goes on to discuss how various scholars interpret this contradiction.  Erp (talk) 06:15, 19 February 2016 (UTC)::Thanks, I don't have access to that source. I've been meaning for a while to put in the context of  [includes worthwhile film], and possibly other pieces in the  project. Browne also discusses CD's oddity in having females selecting in nature, but males selecting in human society. So, this needs developed. . . dave souza, talk 18:09, 19 February 2016 (UTC)Darwinian Irony in liquor labelThe Catalan producer of: 'Anis del mono', an Anise, seems having used the face of Charles Darwin in the label of the bottles, perhaps adding in private comments that the monkey in the bottle may be a relative of mr Charles Darwin, but not of their own. Image added to Wikimedia Commons. Regards, + Salut--Caula (talk) 14:07, 4 March 2016 (UTC):For the curious: :File:Anis del Mono label -the face is reported being that of Charles Darwin.jpg. Johnuniq (talk) 22:13, 4 March 2016 (UTC):: Not much beyond cute  - DVdm (talk) 22:28, 4 March 2016 (UTC)